test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vizzad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - viǯǯâd: # Verb 'to fetch' - full paradigm
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viiǯǯam
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viiǯǯak
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veǯǯ
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viǯǯâp
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viǯǯveʹted
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: veʹǯǯe
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: viiǯǯât
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viiǯǯ
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viʹǯǯem
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viʹǯǯiǩ
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viiǯǯi
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [viiǯǯim, viiǯǯin]
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viiǯǯid
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viʹǯǯe
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: viʹǯǯeš
     viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: viǯǯâm
     viǯǯâd+V+Pot+Sg1: viiǯǯžem
     viǯǯâd+V+Pot+Sg2: viiǯǯžiǩ
     viǯǯâd+V+Pot+Sg3: viiǯǯâž
     viǯǯâd+V+Pot+Pl1: [viiǯǯžep, viiǯǯžim, viiǯǯžin]
     viǯǯâd+V+Pot+Pl2: viiǯǯžid
     viǯǯâd+V+Pot+Pl3: viiǯǯže
     viǯǯâd+V+Pot+Sg4: viiǯǯžet
     viǯǯâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: viiǯǯže
     viǯǯâd+V+Cond+Sg1: viiǯǯčem
     viǯǯâd+V+Cond+Sg2: viiǯǯčiǩ
     viǯǯâd+V+Cond+Sg3: viiǯǯči
     viǯǯâd+V+Cond+Pl1: [viiǯǯčim, viiǯǯčin, viiǯǯčep]
     viǯǯâd+V+Cond+Pl2: viiǯǯčid
     viǯǯâd+V+Cond+Pl3: viiǯǯče
     viǯǯâd+V+Cond+Sg4: viiǯǯčeš
     viǯǯâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: viiǯǯče
     viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+Sg2: viiǯǯ
     viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: veeǯǯas
     viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+Pl1: viǯǯâp
     viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+Pl2: viǯǯâd
     viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+Pl3: veǯǯaz
     viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+ConNeg: viiǯǯ
     viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII: viǯǯu
     viǯǯâd+V+Actio+Ess: viǯǯmen
     viǯǯâd+V+Actio: viǯǯâm
     viǯǯâd+V+Act+PrsPrc: viǯǯi
     viǯǯâd+V+Act+PrfPrc: viǯǯâm
     viǯǯâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: viǯǯum
     viǯǯâd+V+VAbess: [viiǯǯkâni, viiǯǯkani, viiǯǯǩeânai, viiǯǯǩâni, viiǯǯǩani]
     viǯǯâd+V+Ger+Ess: viiǯǯeen
     viǯǯâd+V+Ger+Instr: viiǯǯeeʹl
